Alaska, session 34, HB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that 07 (1) the Bristol Bay watershed is a region of unparalleled ecological value, 08 boasting salmon diversity and productivity unrivaled elsewhere in North America; 09 (2) the region's salmon resources have supported Alaska Native people for 10 thousands of years and continue to support local communities and Alaska Native cultures 11 throughout Southwest Alaska; 12 (3) the Bristol Bay watershed's largely undisturbed aquatic habitats and 13 productive salmon populations support one of the most valuable commercial fisheries in the 14 world, creating $2,200,000,000 each year in economic activity and supporting 15,000 jobs; 01 (4) the Bristol Bay region is home to a vibrant sport fishing, hunting, tourism, 02 and recreation economy, supporting 7,000 fishing and hunting jobs and thousands of full- and 03 part-time tourism and recreation jobs; 04 (5) in 1972, the Seventh Alaska State Legislature determined that a heightened 05 level of protection was needed for Bristol Bay fisheries and acted by designating the Bristol 06 Bay Fisheries Reserve to protect the longstanding and valuable commercial, subsistence, and 07 sport fisheries in the region; 08 (6) the region described as the Bristol Bay Fisheries Reserve and the rivers, 09 streams, and lakes that produce the fish continue to require the same level of protection as 10 when the reserve was created; and 11 (7) the considerations that justified the 1972 action also warrant new 12 protections to prevent hardrock mining activities that would risk polluting the region's river 13 systems, ground water, aquifer systems, and other hydrologic regimes, including any 14 hydrologically interrelated or connected surface and ground water, within the drainage 15 systems that connect to the surface water of Bristol Bay. 16 * Sec. 2. AS 38.05.142 is repealed and reenacted to read: 17 Sec. 38.05.142. Mining activities prohibited within watershed of Bristol 18 Bay Fisheries Reserve. (a) Metallic sulfide mining activities are prohibited within the 19 watershed of the Bristol Bay Fisheries Reserve designated in AS 38.05.140(f). 20 (b) In this section, "metallic sulfide mining activities" means mining activities 21 to extract sulfide minerals or precious metals from sulfide-bearing rock. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.